Illinois, session 104th, HB5616.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-12025 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12025 new)7    Sec. 5-12025. Anti-growth law preemption.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Anti-growth law" means a land use law that explicitly 10limits either the growth of the population in the county's 11jurisdiction or the number of development permits or building 12permit applications for residential development or the 13residential component of any mixed-use development submitted 14to, reviewed by, approved by, or issued by a county for any 15calendar or fiscal year.16    "Land use law" means any statute, resolution, ordinance, 17code, rule, regulation, plan, policy, procedure, standard, 18initiative, guideline, requirement, or law that regulates the 19use or division of property or any interest in property.20    "Property" means real property located within the county 21that is not publicly owned.22    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, a 23county shall not enact or enforce an anti-growth law affecting   HB5616- 2 -LRB104 20709 WRO 34209 b1property unless the anti-growth law complies with one of the 2following exceptions:3        (1) The anti-growth law is enacted or enforced 4    following a disaster declared by the Governor that 5    occurred within the jurisdiction of the county. An 6    anti-growth law affecting property enacted or enforced 7    under this paragraph may be effective for not more than 24 8    months in any 5-year period.9        (2) The anti-growth law is enacted or enforced to 10    provide for the extension or acquisition of public 11    infrastructure, public services, or water resources.12    (c) Nothing in this Section requires a county to approve a 13permit application or precludes a county from regulating the 14use of land, developing land use plans, enacting affordability 15requirements that regulate or restrict market rate development 16or redevelopment in order to enforce affordability 17requirements, regulating the rental of any property or portion 18of a property that is available for lodging for less than 30 19days, or denying a permit for any reason, including extending 20or acquiring infrastructure, water resources, or services. 21This subsection does not apply to a hotel unit portion of a 22structure that is used by a business establishment to provide 23commercial lodging to the general public for predominantly 24overnight or weekly stays, that is classified as a hotel or 25motel for purposes of property taxation, that is not a unit in 26a condominium, and that is zoned or permitted by a county for   HB5616- 3 -LRB104 20709 WRO 34209 b1use as a hotel.2    (d) A home rule county may not regulate property in a 3manner inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a 4limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 5the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 6rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 7    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by adding Section 8110-85 as follows: 9    (60 ILCS 1/110-85 new)10    Sec. 110-85. Anti-growth law preemption.11    (a) As used in this Section:12    "Anti-growth law" means a land use law that explicitly 13limits either the growth of the population in the township's 14jurisdiction or the number of development permits or building 15permit applications for residential development or the 16residential component of any mixed-use development submitted 17to, reviewed by, approved by, or issued by a township for any 18calendar or fiscal year.19    "Land use law" means any statute, resolution, ordinance, 20code, rule, regulation, plan, policy, procedure, standard, 21initiative, guideline, requirement, or law that regulates the 22use or division of property or any interest in property.23    "Property" means real property located within the township 24that is not publicly owned.  HB5616- 4 -LRB104 20709 WRO 34209 b1    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, a 2township shall not enact or enforce an anti-growth law 3affecting property unless the anti-growth law complies with 4one of the following exceptions:5        (1) The anti-growth law is enacted or enforced 6    following a disaster declared by the Governor that 7    occurred within the jurisdiction of the township. An 8    anti-growth law affecting property enacted or enforced 9    under this paragraph may be effective for not more than 24 10    months in any 5-year period.11        (2) The anti-growth law is enacted or enforced to 12    provide for the extension or acquisition of public 13    infrastructure, public services, or water resources.14    (c) Nothing in this Section requires a township to approve 15a permit application or precludes a township from regulating 16the use of land, developing land use plans, enacting 17affordability requirements that regulate or restrict market 18rate development or redevelopment in order to enforce 19affordability requirements, regulating the rental of any 20property or portion of a property that is available for 21lodging for less than 30 days, or denying a permit for any 22reason, including extending or acquiring infrastructure, water 23resources, or services. This subsection does not apply to a 24hotel unit portion of a structure that is used by a business 25establishment to provide commercial lodging to the general 26public for predominantly overnight or weekly stays, that is   HB5616- 5 -LRB104 20709 WRO 34209 b1classified as a hotel or motel for purposes of property 2taxation, that is not a unit in a condominium, and that is 3zoned or permitted by a township for use as a hotel. 4    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-13-30 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)7    Sec. 11-13-30. Anti-growth law preemption.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Anti-growth law" means a land use law that explicitly 10limits either the growth of the population in the 11municipality's jurisdiction or the number of development 12permits or building permit applications for residential 13development or the residential component of any mixed-use 14development submitted to, reviewed by, approved by, or issued 15by a municipality for any calendar or fiscal year.16    "Land use law" means any statute, resolution, ordinance, 17code, rule, regulation, plan, policy, procedure, standard, 18initiative, guideline, requirement, or law that regulates the 19use or division of property or any interest in property.20    "Property" means real property located within the 21municipality that is not publicly owned.22    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, a 23municipality shall not enact or enforce an anti-growth law 24affecting property unless the anti-growth law complies with   HB5616- 6 -LRB104 20709 WRO 34209 b1one of the following exceptions:2        (1) The anti-growth law is enacted or enforced 3    following a disaster declared by the Governor or a state 4    of emergency declared by the mayor of the municipality 5    that occurred within the jurisdiction of the municipality. 6    An anti-growth law affecting property enacted or enforced 7    under this paragraph may be effective for not more than 24 8    months in any 5-year period.9        (2) The anti-growth law is enacted or enforced to 10    provide for the extension or acquisition of public 11    infrastructure, public services, or water resources.12    (c) Nothing in this Section requires a municipality to 13approve a permit application or precludes a municipality from 14regulating the use of land, developing land use plans, 15enacting affordability requirements that regulate or restrict 16market rate development or redevelopment in order to enforce 17affordability requirements, regulating the rental of any 18property or portion of a property that is available for 19lodging for less than 30 days, or denying a permit for any 20reason, including extending or acquiring infrastructure, water 21resources, or services. This subsection does not apply to a 22hotel unit portion of a structure that is used by a business 23establishment to provide commercial lodging to the general 24public for predominantly overnight or weekly stays, that is 25classified as a hotel or motel for purposes of property 26taxation, that is not a unit in a condominium, and that is   HB5616- 7 -LRB104 20709 WRO 34209 b1zoned or permitted by a municipality for use as a hotel.2    (d) A home rule municipality may not regulate property in 3a manner inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a 4limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 5the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 6rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.